Illinois, session 104th, SB2408.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by changing Sections 4, 6, 8, and 20 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3305/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1054)7    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and 9terms have the meanings ascribed to them in this Section:10    "Coordinator" means the staff assistant to the principal 11executive officer of a political subdivision with the duty of 12coordinating the emergency management programs of that 13political subdivision.14    "Cyber incident" means an event occurring on or conducted 15through a computer network that actually or imminently 16jeopardizes the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of 17computers, information or communications systems or networks, 18physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or 19information systems, or information resident thereon that 20affect or control infrastructure or communications networks 21utilized by the public. "Cyber incident" includes a 22vulnerability in information systems, system security 23procedures, internal controls, or implementations that could   SB2408 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1be exploited by a threat source that affect or control 2infrastructure or communications networks utilized by the 3public.4    "Disaster" means an occurrence or threat of widespread or 5severe damage, injury or loss of life or property resulting 6from any natural, technological, or human cause, including but 7not limited to fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, hazardous 8materials spill or other water contamination requiring 9emergency action to avert danger or damage, epidemic, air 10contamination, blight, extended periods of severe and 11inclement weather, drought, infestation, critical shortages of 12essential fuels and energy, explosion, riot, hostile military 13or paramilitary action, public health emergencies, cyber 14incidents, or acts of domestic terrorism.15    "Emergency Management" means the efforts of the State and 16the political subdivisions to develop, plan, analyze, conduct, 17provide, implement and maintain programs for disaster 18mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery.19    "Emergency Services and Disaster Agency" means the agency 20by this name, by the name Emergency Management Agency, or by 21any other name that is established by ordinance within a 22political subdivision to coordinate the emergency management 23program within that political subdivision and with private 24organizations, other political subdivisions, the State and 25federal governments.26    "Emergency Operations Plan" means the written plan of the   SB2408 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1State and political subdivisions describing the organization, 2mission, and functions of the government and supporting 3services for responding to and recovering from disasters and 4shall include plans that take into account the needs of those 5individuals with household pets and service animals following 6a major disaster or emergency.7    "Emergency Services" means the coordination of functions 8by the State and its political subdivision, other than 9functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, 10as may be necessary or proper to prevent, minimize, repair, 11and alleviate injury and damage resulting from any natural or 12technological causes. These functions include, without 13limitation, fire fighting services, police services, emergency 14aviation services, medical and health services, HazMat and 15technical rescue teams, rescue, engineering, warning services, 16communications, radiological, chemical and other special 17weapons defense, evacuation of persons from stricken or 18threatened areas, emergency assigned functions of plant 19protection, temporary restoration of public utility services 20and other functions related to civilian protection, together 21with all other activities necessary or incidental to 22protecting life or property.23    "Exercise" means a planned event realistically simulating 24a disaster, conducted for the purpose of evaluating the 25political subdivision's coordinated emergency management 26capabilities, including, but not limited to, testing the   SB2408 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1emergency operations plan.2    "HazMat team" means a career or volunteer mobile support 3team that has been authorized by a unit of local government to 4respond to hazardous materials emergencies and that is 5primarily designed for emergency response to chemical or 6biological terrorism, radiological emergencies, hazardous 7material spills, releases, or fires, or other contamination 8events. 9    "Illinois Emergency Management Agency" means the agency 10established by this Act within the executive branch of State 11Government responsible for coordination of the overall 12emergency management program of the State and with private 13organizations, political subdivisions, and the federal 14government. Illinois Emergency Management Agency also means 15the State Emergency Response Commission responsible for the 16implementation of Title III of the Superfund Amendments and 17Reauthorization Act of 1986.18    "Incident" means a disaster that does not rise to the 19level of a Governor-issued proclamation. 20    "Mobile Support Team" or "MST" means a group of 21individuals designated as a team by the Governor or Director 22to train prior to and to be activated dispatched, if the 23Governor or the Director so determines, to aid and reinforce 24the State and political subdivision emergency management 25efforts in response to an incident, a disaster, federally 26declared national special security event, or other large   SB2408 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1public event.2    "Municipality" means any city, village, and incorporated 3town.4    "Political Subdivision" means any county, city, village, 5or incorporated town or township if the township is in a county 6having a population of more than 2,000,000.7    "Principal Executive Officer" means chair of the county 8board, supervisor of a township if the township is in a county 9having a population of more than 2,000,000, mayor of a city or 10incorporated town, president of a village, or in their absence 11or disability, the interim successor as established under 12Section 7 of the Emergency Interim Executive Succession Act.13    "Public health emergency" means an occurrence or imminent 14threat of an illness or health condition that:15        (a) is believed to be caused by any of the following:16            (i) bioterrorism;17            (ii) the appearance of a novel or previously 18        controlled or eradicated infectious agent or 19        biological toxin;20            (iii) a natural disaster;21            (iv) a chemical attack or accidental release; or22            (v) a nuclear attack or accident; and23        (b) poses a high probability of any of the following 24    harms:25            (i) a large number of deaths in the affected 26        population;  SB2408 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1            (ii) a large number of serious or long-term 2        disabilities in the affected population; or3            (iii) widespread exposure to an infectious or 4        toxic agent that poses a significant risk of 5        substantial future harm to a large number of people in 6        the affected population.7    "Statewide mutual aid organization" means an entity with 8local government members throughout the State that facilitates 9temporary assistance through its members in a particular 10public safety discipline, such as police, fire or emergency 11management, when an occurrence exceeds a member jurisdiction's 12capabilities. 13    "Technical rescue team" means a career or volunteer mobile 14support team that has been authorized by a unit of local 15government to respond to building collapse, high angle rescue, 16and other specialized rescue emergencies and that is primarily 17designated for emergency response to technical rescue events. 18(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.) 19    (20 ILCS 3305/6)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1056)20    Sec. 6. Emergency Management Powers of the Governor. 21    (a) The Governor shall have general direction and control 22of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and shall be 23responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this 24Act.25    (b) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is   SB2408 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1authorized to cooperate with the federal government and with 2other states in all matters pertaining to emergency 3management.4    (c) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is 5further authorized: 6        (1) To make, amend, and rescind all lawful necessary 7    orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions 8    of this Act within the limits of the authority conferred 9    upon the Governor. 10        (2) To cause to be prepared a comprehensive plan and 11    program for the emergency management of this State, which 12    plan and program shall be integrated into and coordinated 13    with emergency management plans and programs of the 14    federal government and of other states whenever possible 15    and which plan and program may include: 16            a. Mitigation of injury and damage caused by 17        disaster. 18            b. Prompt and effective response to disaster. 19            c. Emergency relief. 20            d. Identification of areas particularly vulnerable 21        to disasters. 22            e. Recommendations for zoning, building, and other 23        land-use controls, safety measures for securing 24        permanent structures and other mitigation measures 25        designed to eliminate or reduce disasters or their 26        impact.   SB2408 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1            f. Assistance to political subdivisions in 2        designing emergency operations plans. 3            g. Authorization and procedures for the erection 4        or other construction of temporary works designed to 5        mitigate danger, damage or loss from flood, or other 6        disaster. 7            h. Preparation and distribution to the appropriate 8        State and political subdivision officials of a State 9        catalog of federal, State, and private assistance 10        programs. 11            i. Organization of State personnel and chains of 12        command. 13            j. Coordination of federal, State, and political 14        subdivision emergency management activities. 15            k. Other necessary matters. 16        (3) In accordance with the plan and program for the 17    emergency management of this State, and out of funds 18    appropriated for these purposes, to procure and 19    preposition supplies, medicines, materials and equipment, 20    to institute training programs and public information 21    programs, and to take all other preparatory steps 22    including the partial or full mobilization of MSTs and 23    emergency services and disaster agencies in advance of 24    actual disaster to insure the furnishing of adequately 25    trained and equipped forces for incidents, disasters, 26    federally declared national special security events, and   SB2408 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1    other large public events disaster response and recovery. 2        (4) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, to 3    make studies and surveys of the industries, resources, and 4    facilities in this State as may be necessary to ascertain 5    the capabilities of the State for emergency management 6    phases of mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery 7    and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof. 8        (5) On behalf of this State, to negotiate for and 9    submit to the General Assembly for its approval or 10    rejection reciprocal mutual aid agreements or compacts 11    with other states, either on a statewide or political 12    subdivision basis. The agreements or compacts, shall be 13    limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, 14    medical or other supplies, engineering and police 15    services; emergency housing and feeding; National and 16    State Guards while under the control of the State; health, 17    medical, and related services; fire fighting, rescue, 18    transportation, communication, and construction services 19    and equipment, provided, however, that if the General 20    Assembly be not in session and the Governor has not 21    proclaimed the existence of a disaster under this Section, 22    then the agreements or compacts shall instead be submitted 23    to an Interim Committee on Emergency Management composed 24    of 5 Senators appointed by the President of the Senate and 25    of 5 Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 26    House, during the month of June of each odd-numbered year   SB2408 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1    to serve for a 2 year term, beginning July 1 of that year, 2    and until their successors are appointed and qualified, or 3    until termination of their legislative service, whichever 4    first occurs. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for 5    the unexpired term in the same manner as original 6    appointments. All appointments shall be made in writing 7    and filed with the Secretary of State as a public record. 8    The Committee shall have the power to approve or reject 9    any agreements or compacts for and on behalf of the 10    General Assembly; and, provided further, that an 11    affirmative vote of 2/3 of the members of the Committee 12    shall be necessary for the approval of any agreement or 13    compact.14(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 15    (20 ILCS 3305/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1058)16    Sec. 8. Mobile Support Teams; mutual aid. 17    (a) The Governor or Director, on behalf of the Governor, 18may enter into agreements with local governments, the federal 19government, tribal governments, and any public or private 20agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this Act and in 21implementing emergency management programs for mitigation, 22preparedness, response, and recovery. 23    (b) The Governor or Director may activate mobile support 24teams (MSTs) to aid and reinforce the Illinois Emergency 25Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, and   SB2408 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1emergency services and disaster agencies in this State or 2out-of-state pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance 3Compact, as ratified in the Emergency Management Assistance 4Compact Act, for incidents, disasters, federally declared 5national special security events, and other large public 6events. 7    (c) (a) The Governor or Director may cause to be created 8Mobile Support Teams to aid and to reinforce the Illinois 9Emergency Management Agency, and emergency services and 10disaster agencies in areas stricken by disaster. Each mobile 11support team shall have a leader or leadership group, selected 12by the Director who will be responsible, under the direction 13and control of the Director, for the organization, 14administration, and training, and general operation of the 15mobile support team.16    (d) While activated on behalf of the State, the MST shall 17report to the Director or designee as the Director retains 18operational control of MSTs even if they have been tasked to 19support emergency services and disaster agencies. 20    (e) (b) Personnel of an MST a mobile support team while 21activated by the Governor or Director on duty pursuant to such 22a call or while engaged in State-approved or State-sponsored 23regularly scheduled training or exercises, whether within or 24without the State, shall either: 25        (1) If they are paid employees of the State, have the 26    powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and   SB2408 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1    receive the compensation incidental to their employment. 2        (2) If they are paid employees of a political 3    subdivision or body politic of this State, and whether 4    serving within or without that political subdivision or 5    body politic, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges 6    and immunities, and receive the compensation incidental to 7    their employment. 8        (3) If they are not employees of the State, political 9    subdivision or body politic, or being such employees, are 10    not normally paid for their services, be entitled to at 11    least one dollar per year compensation from the State.12    (f) All personnel of MSTs may, while activated by the 13Governor or Director, be reimbursed by this State for all 14actual and necessary travel and subsistence expenses related 15to their activation. 16    (g) Personnel of a mobile support team who suffer disease, 17injury or death, while activated by the Governor or Director 18arising out of or in the course of emergency duty, shall for 19the purposes of benefits under the Workers' Compensation Act 20or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act only, be deemed to be 21employees of this State. If the person diseased, injured or 22killed is an employee described in item (3) of subsection (e) 23above, the computation of benefits payable under either of 24those Acts shall be based on income commensurate with 25comparable State employees doing the same type of work or 26income from the person's regular employment, whichever is   SB2408 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1greater.2    All personnel of mobile support teams shall, while on duty 3under such call, be reimbursed by this State for all actual and 4necessary travel and subsistence expenses.5    (h) In lieu of subsection (f), the (c) The State may, by 6agreement, shall reimburse each political subdivision or body 7politic from the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund, or from 8other funding determined by the State, for the compensation 9paid and the actual and necessary travel and , subsistence and 10maintenance expenses of paid employees of the political 11subdivision or body politic while serving, outside of its 12geographical boundaries on behalf of the State pursuant to 13such a call, as members of an MST a mobile support team, and 14for all payments made for death, disease or injury of those 15paid employees arising out of and incurred in the course of 16that duty, and for all losses of or damage to supplies and 17equipment of the political subdivision or body politic 18resulting from the operations.19    (i) (d) Whenever activated MSTs mobile support teams or 20units of another state operating under orders of the Governor 21of their home state, while the Governor has the emergency 22powers provided for under Section 7 of this Act, render aid to 23this State under the orders of the Governor of its home state 24and upon the request of the Governor of this State, all 25questions relating to reimbursement by this State to the other 26state and its citizens in regard to the assistance so rendered   SB2408 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1shall be determined by the mutual aid agreements, MST 2agreements, or interstate compacts described in subparagraph 3(5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 as are existing at the time 4of the assistance rendered, pursuant to the Emergency 5Management Assistance Compact as ratified in the Emergency 6Management Assistance Compact Act, as or are entered into 7thereafter and under Section 303 (d) of the Federal Civil 8Defense Act of 1950.9    (j) (e) No personnel of MSTs mobile support teams of this 10State may be ordered by the Governor or Director to operate in 11any other state unless a request for the same has been made by 12the Governor or duly authorized representative of the other 13state pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, 14as ratified in the Emergency Management Assistance Compact 15Act, or a successor law.16    (k) All expenses and compensation reimbursed under this 17Section may be provided from the Disaster Response and 18Recovery Fund or other funding determined by the State. The 19mutual aid agreement shall specify the manner and method in 20which compensation shall be paid. 21(Source: P.A. 98-465, eff. 8-16-13.) 22    (20 ILCS 3305/20)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1070)23    Sec. 20. Oath Emergency Management Agency; personnel; 24oath. 25    (a) Each person, whether compensated or noncompensated,   SB2408 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1who is appointed to serve in any capacity in, or on behalf of, 2the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 3Homeland Security (IEMA-OHS) or an emergency services and 4disaster agency, shall, before entering upon his or her 5duties, take an oath, in writing. , 6    (b) The oath shall be administered before the Director of 7IEMA-OHS (or a designee authorized in writing by the 8Director), or before the coordinator of the respective that 9emergency services and disaster agency, or before other 10persons authorized to administer oaths in this State pursuant 11to the Oaths an Affirmations Act. , which 12    The oath may be administered through live video technology 13or other electronic means; however, the signed oath shall be 14filed with IEMA-OHS the Director or with the coordinator of 15the emergency services and disaster agency with which the 16person he or she shall serve and which oath shall be 17substantially as follows:18    "I, _______________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I 19will support and defend and bear true faith and allegiance to 20the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of 21the State of Illinois, and the territory, institutions and 22facilities thereof, both public and private, against all 23enemies, foreign and domestic; that I take this obligation 24freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; 25and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties upon 26which I am about to enter. And I do further swear (or affirm)   SB2408 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 12194 BDA 22298 b1that I do not advocate, nor am I, nor have I been a member of 2any political party or organization that advocates the 3overthrow of the government of the United States or of this 4State by force or violence; and that during such time as I am 5affiliated with the (name of emergency preparedness 6organization political subdivision), I will not advocate nor 7become a member or an affiliate of any organization, group, or 8combination of persons of any political party or organization 9that advocates the overthrow of the government of the United 10States or of this State by force or violence."11(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.)